Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5605YH (2) 91 ms/js H.F. 2290 Section 1. Section 359.17, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The board of township trustees in each township shall 3 consist of three registered voters of the township. However, 4 in townships with a taxable valuation for property tax purposes 5 of two hundred fifty million dollars or more, the board of 6 township trustees shall consist of five registered voters 7 of the township. The trustees shall act as fence viewers 8 as provided in chapter 359A and shall perform other duties 9 assigned them by law. The board of trustees shall meet not 10 less than two times a year. At least one of the meetings shall 11 be scheduled to meet the requirements of section 359.49 . 12